Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB155.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 214.456 is amended to read as follows:
The following policies shall apply to autologous and directed blood donations:
(1) Any otherwise qualified donor who wishes to direct a donation of blood to that
person or to another particular individual may do so. The surcharge for any
autologous or directed donation of blood shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of
the charge for a regular unit of blood.
(2) If the donation is to another particular individual, the requirements of KRS 214.454
shall be met if the recipient and the recipient's attending physician have requested
the donation.
(3) Blood collected as a directed donation may be used for someone other than, or in
addition to, the designated recipient if the donor's blood is not compatible with that
of the designated recipient or if any part of the donation is not needed by the
designated recipient.
(4) Each blood establishment shall advise prospective donors of the opportunity for
autologous and directed donations and of the provisions of this section and of KRS
214.452 to 214.466.
(5) A health facility that facilitates autologous or directed blood donations shall
comply with a health care provider's order prescribing an autologous or directed
blood donation for an individual.
(6) A health facility shall allow an individual on whom a medical procedure is to be
performed to provide an autologous or directed blood donation ordered by a
health care provider for the medical procedure.
(7)[(5)] Autologous blood donation programs shall be exempt from KRS 214.454.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/7/2025 1:27 PM Jacketed